Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-491.17, to read: START_STATUTE23-491.17. Employee use elevators; construction projects; requirements A construction project that is designed to be at least sixty feet above ground level or at least forty-eight feet below ground level shall include a personnel hoist, a temporary elevator or an elevator for employee use. The elevator is required to be installed and in proper working condition when the structure reaches thirty-six feet in height that is measured from the ground level to the highest point of the structure that: 1. Includes all of the following: (a) Parapet walls. (b) Mechanical rooms. (c) Stair towers. (d) Elevator penthouse structures. 2. Does not include: (a) Antennas. (b) Smokestacks. (c) Flag poles. (d) Any other similar attachments. END_STATUTE